Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Article 7. Prohibited Acts, Penalties, and Liabilities.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Drugs and Controlled Substances, § 189 et seq.

35 Am. Jur. 2d, Food, §§ 63 et seq., 74 et seq.

Sec. 17.20.290.
Prohibited acts.

The following acts and the causing thereof are prohibited:

the manufacture, or sale, or delivery, holding, or offering of sale of food, drug, device, or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded;

the adulteration or misbranding of food, drug, device, or cosmetic;

the receipt in commerce of food, drug, device, or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded, and the delivery or proffered delivery of them for pay or otherwise;

the sale, delivery for sale, holding for sale, or offering for sale of an article in violation of AS

17.20.050

—

17.20.070

and

17.20.100

;

the dissemination of a false advertisement;

the refusal to permit entry or inspection, or to permit the taking of a sample, as authorized by AS

17.20.200

;

the giving of a guaranty or undertaking that is false, except by a person who relied on a guaranty or undertaking to the same effect signed by and containing the name and address of the person residing in the state from whom the person who relied on the guarantee or undertaking received the food, drug, device, or cosmetic in good faith;

the removal or disposal of a detained or embargoed article in violation of AS

17.20.230

—

17.20.270

;

the alteration, mutilation, destruction, obliteration, or removal of the whole or part of the labeling of, or the doing of any other act with respect to, a food, drug, device, or cosmetic, if the act is done while the article is held for sale and results in the article being misbranded;

forging, counterfeiting, simulating, or falsely representing, or without proper authority using a mark, stamp, tag, label, or other identification device authorized or required by regulations adopted under AS

17.20.230

—

17.20.270

;

the using, on the labeling of a drug or in an advertisement relating to a drug, of a representation or suggestion that an application with respect to the drug is effective under AS

17.20.110

or that the drug complies with the provisions of that section;

the sale or offering for sale of frozen fish as fresh fish;

the improper labeling and drug substitution by pharmacists under AS

17.20.105

.

The commissioner of environmental conservation or a designee of the commissioner is responsible for enforcing the provisions of (a)(1) — (10) of this section, if the subject of the prohibited act involves food or cosmetics, and the provisions of (a)(12) of this section. This subsection does not limit the authority of peace officers.

The commissioner of health and social services or a designee of the commissioner is responsible for enforcing the provisions of (a)(1) — (10) of this section, if the subject of the prohibited act involves drugs or devices, and the provisions of (a)(11) and (13) of this section. This subsection does not limit the authority of peace officers.

History.

(§ 3 ch 129 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 119 SLA 1967; am § 2 ch 17 SLA 1971; am E.O. No. 51, § 30 (1981); am §§ 2, 3 ch 151 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For food care, see 18 AAC 31, art. 2.

For management and personnel, see 18 AAC 31, art. 3.

For equipment and utensils, see 18 AAC 31, art. 4.

For sanitation and physical facilities, see 18 AAC 31, art. 5.

For temporary food service, limited food service, kiosks, mobile food units, see 18 AAC 31, art. 6.

For food processing, see 18 AAC 31, art. 7.

For markets, see 18 AAC 31, art. 8.

For milk and milk products, see 18 AAC 32, art. 1.

For reindeer slaughtering and processing, see 18 AAC 32, art. 3.

For seafood processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 1.

Sec. 17.20.300.
Determination of misleading labeling or advertisement.

If an article is alleged to be misbranded because the labeling is misleading, or if an advertisement is alleged to be false because it is misleading, in determining whether the labeling or advertisement is misleading, there shall be taken into account among other things representations made or suggested by statement, word, design, device, sound, or combination of them, and the extent to which the labeling or advertisement fails to reveal facts material in the light of the representations or material with respect to consequences that may result from the use of the article to which the labeling or advertisement relates under the conditions of use prescribed in the labeling or advertisement or under customary or usual conditions of use.

History.

(§ 2(l) ch 129 SLA 1949)

Administrative Code. —

For food processing, see 18 AAC 31, art. 7.

Collateral references. —

Products liability of manufacturer or seller for injury or death allegedly caused by failure to warn regarding danger in use of vaccine or prescription drug. 94 ALR3d 748.

Promotional efforts directed towards prescribing physician as affecting prescription drug manufacturer’s liability for product-caused injury. 94 ALR3d 1080.

What constitutes “false advertising” of food products or cosmetics within §§ 5 and 12 of the Federal Trade Commission Act (15 USCS §§ 45, 52). 50 ALR Fed. 16.

Sec. 17.20.305.
Penalty for violation.

A person who with criminal negligence violates a provision of this chapter or a regulation, order, quarantine, embargo, or recall made under authority of this chapter, or violates a provision of a permit issued under this chapter, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor for each offense. The use of this section for a violation does not prevent imposition of a penalty under AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

for the same violation. In this section, “criminal negligence” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 19 ch 72 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 151 SLA 2004)

Sec. 17.20.310.
Penalties. [Repealed, § 26 ch 72 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 17.20.315.
Civil fine.

In addition to any other penalties imposed under this chapter or AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

, the department may impose a civil fine on a person for a serious violation or a repeat violation of this chapter, including the regulations adopted under this chapter.

The department shall, by regulation, adopt a schedule of fines that a person may be required to pay under this section. A fine may not exceed $1,000 for each violation.

In this section, “department” means the Department of Environmental Conservation.

History.

(§ 5 ch 151 SLA 2004)

Sec. 17.20.320.
Effect of written guaranty.

A person is not subject to the penalties of AS

17.20.305

,

17.20.315

, or AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

for having violated AS

17.20.290(a)(1)

or (3) if that person establishes a guaranty or undertaking signed by and containing the name and address of the person residing in the state from whom the article was received in good faith, to the effect that it is not adulterated or misbranded within the meaning of this chapter.

History.

(§ 5(b) ch 129 SLA 1949; am § 20 ch 72 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 151 SLA 2004)

Sec. 17.20.330.
Liability for dissemination of false advertising.

The publisher, radio-broadcast licensee, or agency or medium for the dissemination of an advertisement, except the manufacturer, packer, distributor, or seller of the article to which a false advertisement relates, is not liable under AS

17.20.305

,

17.20.315

, or AS

45.50.471

—

45.50.561

for the dissemination of the false advertisement, unless the publisher, licensee, agency, or medium has refused the request of the commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development to furnish the name and post office address of the manufacturer, packer, distributor, seller, or advertising agency residing in the state who caused dissemination of the advertisement.

History.

(§ 5(c) ch 129 SLA 1949; am E.O. No. 51, § 31 (1981); am § 21 ch 72 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 151 SLA 2004; am § 33 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Collateral references. —

What constitutes “false advertising” of food products or cosmetics within §§ 5 and 12 of the Federal Trade Commission Act (15 USCS §§ 45, 52). 50 ALR Fed. 16.